Nebraska, session 109, LB35.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB35 LB35
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 70-1014.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
70-1014.02 (1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Nebraska has the authority as a sovereign state to protect its
land, natural resources, and cultural resources for economic and
aesthetic purposes for the benefit of its residents and future
generations by regulation of energy generation projects;
(b) The unique terrain and ecology of the Nebraska Sandhills provide
an irreplaceable habitat for millions of migratory birds and other
wildlife every year and serve as the home to numerous ranchers and
farmers;
(c) The grasslands of the Nebraska Sandhills and other natural
resources in Nebraska will become increasingly valuable, both
economically and strategically, as the demand for food and energy
increases; and
(d) The Nebraska Sandhills are home to priceless archaeological
sites of historical and cultural significance to American Indians.
(2)(a) A privately developed renewable energy generation facility
that meets the requirements of this section is exempt from sections
70-1012 to 70-1014.01 if, no less than thirty days prior to the
commencement of construction, the owner of the facility:
(i) Notifies the board in writing of its intent to commence
construction of a privately developed renewable energy generation
facility;
(ii) Certifies to the board that the facility will meet the
requirements for a privately developed renewable energy generation
facility;
(iii) Certifies to the board that the private electric supplier will
(A) comply with any decommissioning requirements adopted by the local
governmental entities having jurisdiction over the privately developed
renewable energy generation facility and (B) except as otherwise provided
-2-

LB35 LB35
2025 2025
in subdivision (b) of this subsection, submit a decommissioning plan to
the board obligating the private electric supplier to bear all costs of
decommissioning the privately developed renewable energy generation
facility and requiring that the private electric supplier post a security
bond or other instrument, no later than the sixth year following
commercial operation, securing the costs of decommissioning the facility
and provide a copy of the bond or instrument to the board;
(iv) Certifies to the board that the private electric supplier has
entered into or prior to commencing construction will enter into a joint
transmission development agreement pursuant to subdivision (c) of this
subsection with the electric supplier owning the transmission facilities
of sixty thousand volts or greater to which the privately developed
renewable energy generation facility will interconnect;
(v) Certifies to the board that the private electric supplier has
consulted with the Game and Parks Commission to identify potential
measures to avoid, minimize, and mitigate impacts to species identified
under subsection (1) or (2) of section 37-806 during the project planning
and design phases, if possible, but in no event later than the
commencement of construction;
(vi) Certifies in writing to the board that the facility, if located
within a ten-mile radius of a military installation:
(A) Contains no materials, electronics, or other components
manufactured by any foreign government or foreign nongovernment person
determined to be a foreign adversary pursuant to 15 C.F.R. 791.4, as such
regulation existed on January 1, 2025 7.4; or
(B) Will, upon reaching commercial operation, be Is in compliance
with the critical infrastructure protection requirements issued by the
North American Electric Reliability Corporation if connected to the
transmission grid at one hundred kilovolts or higher voltage and has to
have a nameplate rating of twenty megavolt amperes for a single
generation unit or injecting at an aggregate of seventy-five megavolt
-3-

LB35 LB35
2025 2025
amperes or greater. The private electric supplier shall also submit
written notice to the board at any time such private electric supplier is
no longer in such compliance; and
(vii) For a proposed privately developed renewable energy generation
facility that has a generating capacity that is greater than ten
megawatts, certifies to the board that the private electric supplier has
held at least one public meeting with advanced publicized notice in one
of the counties in which the proposed facility will be located at which
(A) the private electric supplier explains the need for the proposed
facility and the type of facility and (B) real property owners in any of
the counties in which the proposed facility will be located are provided
an opportunity to comment on the proposed facility. The private electric
supplier shall provide a report to the board containing the minutes of
any such meeting and how many people commented on the proposed facility.
Documentation received at any such meeting shall be made available to the
board upon its request. A meeting described in this subdivision is not
subject to the requirements described in subdivision (3)(b)(iv) of
section 84-1411.
(b) The board may bring an action in the name of the State of
Nebraska for failure to comply with subdivision (a)(iii)(B) of this
subsection, except that such subdivision does not apply if a local
government entity with the authority to create requirements for
decommissioning has enacted decommissioning requirements for the
applicable jurisdiction.
(c) A joint transmission development agreement shall be entered into
to address construction, ownership, operation, and maintenance of such
additions or upgrades to the transmission facilities as required for the
privately developed renewable energy generation facility. The joint
transmission development agreement shall be negotiated and executed
contemporaneously with the generator interconnection agreement or other
directives of the applicable regional transmission organization with
-4-

LB35 LB35
2025 2025
jurisdiction over the addition or upgrade of transmission, upon terms
consistent with prudent electric utility practices for the
interconnection of renewable generation facilities, the electric
supplier's reasonable transmission interconnection requirements, and
applicable transmission design and construction standards. The electric
supplier shall have the right to purchase and own transmission facilities
as set forth in the joint transmission development agreement. The private
electric supplier of the privately developed renewable energy generation
facility shall have the right to construct any necessary facilities or
improvements set forth in the joint transmission development agreement
pursuant to the standards set forth in the agreement at the private
electric supplier's cost.
(3) Within ten days after receipt of a written notice complying with
subsection (2) of this section, the executive director of the board shall
issue a written acknowledgment that the privately developed renewable
energy generation facility is exempt from sections 70-1012 to 70-1014.01
if such facility remains in compliance with the requirements of this
section.
(4) The exemption allowed under this section for a privately
developed renewable energy generation facility shall extend to and exempt
all private electric suppliers owning any interest in the facility,
including any successor private electric supplier which subsequently
acquires any interest in the facility.
(5) No property owned, used, or operated as part of a privately
developed renewable energy generation facility shall be subject to
eminent domain by a consumer-owned electric supplier operating in the
State of Nebraska. Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant
the power of eminent domain to a private electric supplier or limit the
rights of any entity to acquire any public, municipal, or utility right-
of-way across property owned, used, or operated as part of a privately
developed renewable energy generation facility as long as the right-of-
-5-

LB35 LB35
2025 2025
way does not prevent the operation of or access to the privately
developed renewable energy generation facility.
(6) Only a consumer-owned electric supplier operating in the State
of Nebraska may exercise eminent domain authority to acquire the land
rights necessary for the construction of transmission lines and related
facilities. There is a rebuttable presumption that the exercise of
eminent domain to provide needed transmission lines and related
facilities for a privately developed renewable energy generation facility
is a public use.
(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a
private electric supplier to sell or deliver electricity at retail in
Nebraska.
(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the
authority of or require a consumer-owned electric supplier operating in
the State of Nebraska to enter into a joint agreement with a private
electric supplier to develop, construct, and jointly own a privately
developed renewable energy generation facility.
Sec. 2. Original section 70-1014.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-6-